Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.130

Appeals.

Any person who feels aggrieved by an order of the department including the granting, denial, revocation, or suspension of a license issued by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to an appeal pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310.

[ 1987 c 109 s 24; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 13.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Short title—Construction—Rules—Severability—Captions—1987 c 109: See notes following RCW 43.21B.001.